North Dakota, session 69, HB1598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-01-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
20.1-01-07. Hunting big game or small game other than waterfowl or cranes with
motor-driven vehicles prohibited - Exception - Motor-driven vehicle use in transporting big game
restricted.
1. Except as provided in subsection 10 of section 20.1-02-05 and as otherwise provided in this
section, a personan individual, other than the landowner, without the written permission of the
landowner or a lessee who actively farms or ranches that land, while hunting big game or
small game, other than waterfowl or cranes, statewide, may not use a motor-driven vehicle on
any land other than an established road or trail without the written permission of the
landowner, unless that personindividual has reduced a big game animal to possession and
cannot easily retrieve the big game animal, in which case a motor-driven vehicle may be used
to retrieve the big game animal, but after retrieval, the motor-driven vehicle must be returned
to the established road or trail along the same route it originally departed. A person may not
use a motor-driven vehicle on any land other than an established road or trail to hunt upland
game during the deer gun season.
2. For purposes of safety and allowing normal travel, a motor-driven vehicle may be parked on
the roadside or directly adjacent to said road or trail.
3. No personindividual, while hunting big game or small game, statewide, may drive or attempt to
drive, run or attempt to run, molest or attempt to molest, flush or attempt to flush, or harass or
attempt to harass any such game with the use or aid of any motor-driven vehicle. A person,
other than the landowner, without the written permission of the landowner or a lessee who
actively farms or ranches that land, while hunting big game or small game, other than
waterfowl or cranes, statewide, may not drive through any retired cropland, brush area, slough
area, timber area, open prairie, or unharvested or harvested cropland, except upon an
established road or trail. The provisions of this section relating to hunting big game or small
game while using a motor-driven vehicle on any land other than an established road or trail
without the written permission of the landowner or a lessee who actually farms or ranches that
land do not apply to the hunting of big game during an open and lawful season for small
game.

H. B. NO. 1598 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1598.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 2 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State